North Carolina, session 2025, HB227.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 144 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 144-10. Flags purchased with public funds.
A State institution or political subdivision of the State shall not use public funds to purchase
a flag of the United States of America or the State of North Carolina unless the flag has been one
hundred percent (100%) manufactured in the United States from articles, materials, or supplies
that have been grown or one hundred percent (100%) produced or manufactured in the United
States."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to purchases
made on or after that date.
*H227-v-1*